Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.800

Nonprofit or exempt organizations—Report.

(1) Any nonprofit organization engaged in debt adjusting in this state or exempt from this chapter pursuant to RCW 18.28.010(1)(g) shall provide the following information to the department of financial institutions in a form prescribed by the department by June 30, 2016, and again on June 30, 2017:

(a) The number and percentage of Washington debtors for whom the debt adjuster provides or provided debt adjusting services in the previous year who became inactive in, canceled, or terminated those services without settlement of all of the debtor's debts, by year of enrollment;

(b) The total fees collected from Washington debtors during the previous year;

(c) The total fair share contributions collected from creditors of Washington debtors during the previous year;

(d) For each debtor for whom the debt adjuster provides debt adjusting services:

(i) The date of contracting;

(ii) The number of debts included in the contract between the debt adjuster and the debtor;

(iii) The principal amount of each debt at the time the contract was signed;

(iv) The source of each debtor's obligation, categorized as credit card, student loans, auto, medical, small loans under chapter 31.45 RCW, other secured debt, and other unsecured debt;

(v) Whether each debt is active, terminated, or settled;

(vi) If a debt has been settled, the settlement amount of the debt and the savings amount, calculated by subtracting the amount paid to settle the debt from the principal amount of the debt at the time the contract was signed; and

(vii) The total fees charged to the debtor and how the fees were calculated;

(e) For Washington debtors who became inactive in, canceled, or terminated debt adjuster services during the previous year, the number and percentage of debtors who, as measured by the aggregate amount of each debtor's enrolled debts:

(i) Settled zero percent of their enrolled debt;

(ii) Settled up to twenty-five percent of their enrolled debt;

(iii) Settled twenty-five percent to fifty percent of their enrolled debt;

(iv) Settled fifty-one percent to seventy-five percent of their enrolled debt;

(v) Settled seventy-six percent to ninety-nine percent of their enrolled debt;

(f) The number and percentage of Washington debtors for whom the debt adjuster provides or provided debt adjusting services in the previous three years who fully settled one hundred percent of their enrolled debt through those debt adjusting services, by year of enrollment; and

(g)(i) The nonprofit organization's form 990 submitted to the internal revenue service in the preceding year; or

(ii) A statement of previous year's base salary and other compensation of the nonprofit organization's officers, directors, trustees, and other employees and independent contractors receiving greater than one hundred fifty thousand dollars in total compensation, if the form 990 does not contain such information or if the organization did not submit a form 990 in the preceding year.

(2) The department of financial institutions shall make public and submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a report summarizing the information received under subsection (1) of this section by December 1, 2016, and again on December 1, 2017.

[ 2015 c 167 s 4.]